Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.410

Pneumatic tires.

"Pneumatic tires" includes every tire of rubber or other resilient material designed to be inflated with compressed air to support the load thereon.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.410. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 43; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]